Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-327.03
Game and Parks State Park Improvement and Maintenance Fund; created; use; investment.

The Game and Parks State Park Improvement and Maintenance Fund is created. The fund shall consist of transfers made by the Legislature, money credited to the fund pursuant to section 60-3,163.02, and any gifts, grants, bequests, or donations to the fund. The money credited to the fund pursuant to section 60-3,163.02 shall be used only for the improvement and maintenance of state recreational trails as defined in section 37-338. Any other money in the fund shall be used to build, repair, renovate, rehabilitate, restore, modify, or improve any infrastructure in the state park system. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. Beginning October 1, 2024, any investment earnings from investment of money in the fund shall be credited to the General Fund.

Laws 2014, LB906, § 4;

Laws 2020, LB944, § 3;

Laws 2024, First Spec. Sess., LB3, § 7;

Laws 2025, LB398, § 3.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.